Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1586.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The chapter heading of title 41, chapter 49, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "FEDERAL MONIES" to "FEDERAL MONIES AND FEDERAL RULE IMPLEMENTATION". Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 49, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-4902, to read: START_STATUTE41-4902. State agencies; guidance; posting; annual report A. Each state agency shall: 1. create a dedicated page on the state agency's website and post all guidance that the state agency creates, develops or adopts. 2. post on THE STATE AGENCY'S WEBSITE all guidance that the state agency receives from a federal agency if the federal guidance: (a) Seeks to influence the state agency's interpretation, enforcement or implementation of State laws, rules or policies or its administration of federal monies. (b) PROVIDES recommendations or instructions to the state agency on compliance with federal laws or regulations. B. Each state AGENCY that posts INFORMATION pursuant to subsection A of THIS section shall also include all of the following: 1. The full text or an electronic copy of the guidance. 2. The date the guidance was created or received by the state agency. 3. A brief summary of the content of the guidance and its potential impact on the state agency's operations or policies. C. Each state agency shall post all guidance within THIRTY days after creating or adopting the guidance or RECEIving the GUIDANCE from the federal agency. D. If any GUIDANCE that the state agency RECEIVES from a federal agency is marked as confidential or restricted, the state agency shall do both of the following: 1. post a notice on the state agency's website indicating the existence of the guidance and the reason it may not be disclosed to the public. 2. Seek clarification from the federal agency if any portion of the GUIDANCE may be disclosed. E. This section does not apply to any personally identifiable information or SENSITIVE security information or any internal state agency communications relating to a guidance issued by a federal agency. F. On or before December 31, 2026 and each year thereafter, each state agency shall submit a report to the PRESIDENT of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives regarding the state agency's compliance with this section and any findings. END_STATUTE